North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 3. Labor of Prisoners.
§ 148-33.
Prison labor furnished other State agencies. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may furnish to any of the other State departments, State institutions, or agencies, upon such conditions as may be agreed upon from time to time between the Division and the governing authorities of such Department, institution or agency, prison labor for carrying on any work where it is practical and desirable to use prison labor in the furtherance of the purposes of any State department, institution or agency, and such other employment as is now provided by law for inmates of the State’s prison under the provisions of

G.S. 148-6

: Provided that such prisoners shall at all times be under the custody of and controlled by the duly authorized agent of such Division. Provided, further, that notwithstanding any provisions of law contained in this Article or in this Chapter, no prisoner or group of prisoners may be assigned to work in any building utilized by any State department, agency, or institution unless a duly designated custodial agent of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction is assigned to the building to maintain supervision and control of the prisoner or prisoners working there.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 30; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1961, c. 966; 1967, c. 996, ss. 13, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2007-398, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxxx); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-398, s. 4, effective August 21, 2007, in the last sentence, deleted “male” twice preceding “prisoner” and preceding “prisoners,” and deleted “where women are housed or employed” preceding “unless a duly designated custodial agent.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction,” substituted “Division” for “Department,” and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction.”

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 61, effective June 26, 2012, deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxxx), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the middle of the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-33.1.
Sentencing, quartering, and control of prisoners with work-release privileges. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Whenever a person is sentenced to imprisonment for a term to be served in the State prison system or a local confinement facility, the Secretary of Public Safety may authorize the Director of Prisons or the custodian of the local confinement facility to grant work-release privileges to any inmate who is eligible for work release and who has not been granted work-release privileges by order of the sentencing court. The Secretary of Public Safety shall authorize immediate work-release privileges for any person serving a sentence not exceeding five years in the State prison system and for whom the presiding judge shall have recommended work-release privileges when (i) it is verified that appropriate employment for the person is available in an area where, in the judgment of the Secretary, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety has facilities to which the person may suitably be assigned, and (ii) custodial and correctional considerations would not be adverse to releasing the person without supervision into the free community.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 541, s. 2.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall from time to time, as the need becomes evident, designate and adapt facilities in the State prison system for quartering prisoners with work-release privileges. No State or county prisoner shall be granted work-release privileges by the Director of Prisons or the custodian of a local confinement facility until suitable facilities for quartering him have been provided in the area where the prisoner has employment or the offer of employment.

The Secretary of Public Safety is authorized and directed to establish a work-release plan under which an eligible prisoner may be released from actual custody during the time necessary to proceed to the place of his employment, perform his work, and return to quarters designated by the prison authorities. If the prisoner shall violate any of the conditions prescribed by prison rules and regulations for the administration of the work-release plan, then such prisoner may be withdrawn from work-release privileges, and the prisoner may be transferred to the general prison population to serve out the remainder of his sentence. Rules and regulations for the administration of the work-release plan shall be established in the same manner as other rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system.

The State Department of Labor shall exercise the same supervision over conditions of employment for persons working in the free community while serving sentences imposed under this section as the Department does over conditions of employment for free persons.

A prisoner who is convicted of a felony and who is granted work-release privileges shall give his work-release earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law, to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. A prisoner who is convicted of a misdemeanor, is committed to a local confinement facility, and is granted work-release privileges by order of the sentencing court shall give his work-release earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law, to the custodian of the local confinement facility. Other misdemeanants granted work-release privileges shall give their work-release earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law, to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety or the sentencing court, as appropriate, shall determine the amount to be deducted from a prisoner’s work-release earnings to pay for the cost of the prisoner’s keep and to accumulate a reasonable sum to be paid the prisoner when he is paroled or discharged from prison. The Division or sentencing court shall also determine the amount to be disbursed by the Division or clerk of court, as appropriate, for each of the following:

To pay travel and other expenses of the prisoner made necessary by his employment;

To provide a reasonable allowance to the prisoner for his incidental personal expenses;

To make payments for the support of the prisoner’s dependents in accordance with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or in the absence of a court order, in accordance with a determination of dependency status and need made by the local department of social services in the county of North Carolina in which such dependents reside;

(3a)

To make restitution or reparation as provided in

G.S. 148-33.2

.

To comply with an order from any court of competent jurisdiction regarding the payment of an obligation of the prisoner in connection with any judgment rendered by the court.

To comply with a written request by the prisoner to withhold an amount, when the request has been granted by the Division or the sentencing court, as appropriate.Any balance of his earnings remaining at the time the prisoner is released from prison shall be paid to him. The Social Services Commission is authorized to promulgate uniform rules and regulations governing the duties of county social services departments under this section.

No prisoner employed in the free community under the provisions of this section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the State prison system while working in the free community or going to or from such employment.

Any prisoner employed under the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to any benefits under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes entitled “Employment Security” during the term of the sentence.

No recommendation for work release shall be made at the time of sentencing in any case in which the presiding judge shall suspend the imposition of sentence and place a convicted person on probation; however, if probation be subsequently revoked and the active sentence of imprisonment executed, the court may at that time recommend work release. Neither a recommendation for work release by the court or the decision of the Secretary of Public Safety to place a person on work release shall give rise to any vested statutory right to an individual to be placed on or continued on work release.

The provisions of subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this section shall also apply to prisoners employed in private prison enterprises conducted pursuant to

G.S. 148-70

.

History.

1957, c. 540; 1959, c. 126; 1961, c. 420; 1963, c. 469, ss. 1, 2; 1967, c. 684; c. 996, s. 13; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 22, ss. 1-3; c. 679, s. 3; 1977, c. 450, ss. 4, 5; c. 614, s. 6; c. 623, ss. 1, 2; c. 711, s. 29; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 1981, c. 541, ss. 1-3; 1985, c. 474, s. 3; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 201(f)-(i); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 902, s. 6; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, ss. 2(yyyyyyy), 3(a).

§ 148-33.1.
Sentencing, quartering, and control of prisoners with work-release privileges. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Whenever a person is sentenced to imprisonment for a term to be served in the State prison system or a local confinement facility, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may authorize the Director of Prisons or the custodian of the local confinement facility to grant work-release privileges to any inmate who is eligible for work release and who has not been granted work-release privileges by order of the sentencing court. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall authorize immediate work-release privileges for any person serving a sentence not exceeding five years in the State prison system and for whom the presiding judge shall have recommended work-release privileges when (i) it is verified that appropriate employment for the person is available in an area where, in the judgment of the Secretary, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction has facilities to which the person may suitably be assigned, and (ii) custodial and correctional considerations would not be adverse to releasing the person without supervision into the free community.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 541, s. 2.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall from time to time, as the need becomes evident, designate and adapt facilities in the State prison system for quartering prisoners with work-release privileges. No State or county prisoner shall be granted work-release privileges by the Director of Prisons or the custodian of a local confinement facility until suitable facilities for quartering him have been provided in the area where the prisoner has employment or the offer of employment.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized and directed to establish a work-release plan under which an eligible prisoner may be released from actual custody during the time necessary to proceed to the place of his employment, perform his work, and return to quarters designated by the prison authorities. If the prisoner shall violate any of the conditions prescribed by prison rules and regulations for the administration of the work-release plan, then such prisoner may be withdrawn from work-release privileges, and the prisoner may be transferred to the general prison population to serve out the remainder of his sentence. Rules and regulations for the administration of the work-release plan shall be established in the same manner as other rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system.

The State Department of Labor shall exercise the same supervision over conditions of employment for persons working in the free community while serving sentences imposed under this section as the Department does over conditions of employment for free persons.

A prisoner who is convicted of a felony and who is granted work-release privileges shall give his work-release earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law, to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. A prisoner who is convicted of a misdemeanor, is committed to a local confinement facility, and is granted work-release privileges by order of the sentencing court shall give his work-release earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law, to the custodian of the local confinement facility. Other misdemeanants granted work-release privileges shall give their work-release earnings, less standard payroll deductions required by law, to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or the sentencing court, as appropriate, shall determine the amount to be deducted from a prisoner’s work-release earnings to pay for the cost of the prisoner’s keep and to accumulate a reasonable sum to be paid the prisoner when he is paroled or discharged from prison. The Division or sentencing court shall also determine the amount to be disbursed by the Division or clerk of court, as appropriate, for each of the following:

To pay travel and other expenses of the prisoner made necessary by his employment;

To provide a reasonable allowance to the prisoner for his incidental personal expenses;

To make payments for the support of the prisoner’s dependents in accordance with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or in the absence of a court order, in accordance with a determination of dependency status and need made by the local department of social services in the county of North Carolina in which such dependents reside;

(3a)

To make restitution or reparation as provided in

G.S. 148-33.2

.

To comply with an order from any court of competent jurisdiction regarding the payment of an obligation of the prisoner in connection with any judgment rendered by the court.

To comply with a written request by the prisoner to withhold an amount, when the request has been granted by the Division or the sentencing court, as appropriate.Any balance of his earnings remaining at the time the prisoner is released from prison shall be paid to him. The Social Services Commission is authorized to promulgate uniform rules and regulations governing the duties of county social services departments under this section.

No prisoner employed in the free community under the provisions of this section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the State prison system while working in the free community or going to or from such employment.

Any prisoner employed under the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to any benefits under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes entitled “Employment Security” during the term of the sentence.

No recommendation for work release shall be made at the time of sentencing in any case in which the presiding judge shall suspend the imposition of sentence and place a convicted person on probation; however, if probation be subsequently revoked and the active sentence of imprisonment executed, the court may at that time recommend work release. Neither a recommendation for work release by the court or the decision of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to place a person on work release shall give rise to any vested statutory right to an individual to be placed on or continued on work release.

The provisions of subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this section shall also apply to prisoners employed in private prison enterprises conducted pursuant to

G.S. 148-70

.

History.

1957, c. 540; 1959, c. 126; 1961, c. 420; 1963, c. 469, ss. 1, 2; 1967, c. 684; c. 996, s. 13; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 22, ss. 1-3; c. 679, s. 3; 1977, c. 450, ss. 4, 5; c. 614, s. 6; c. 623, ss. 1, 2; c. 711, s. 29; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 1981, c. 541, ss. 1-3; 1985, c. 474, s. 3; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 201(f)-(i); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 902, s. 6; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, ss. 2(yyyyyyy), 3(a); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

§ 148-33.2.
Restitution by prisoners with work-release privileges. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 474, s. 4.

As a rehabilitative measure, the Secretary of Public Safety is authorized to require any prisoner granted work-release privileges to make restitution or reparation to an aggrieved party from any earnings gained by the defendant while on work release when the sentencing court recommends that restitution or reparation be paid by the defendant out of any earnings gained by the defendant if he is granted work-release privileges and out of other resources of the defendant, including all real and personal property owned by the defendant and the income derived from such property. The Secretary shall not be bound by such recommendation, but if they elect not to implement the recommendation, they shall state in writing the reasons therefor, and shall forward the same to the sentencing court.

When an active sentence is imposed, the court shall consider whether, as a rehabilitative measure, it should recommend to the Secretary of Public Safety that restitution or reparation be made by the defendant out of any earnings gained by the defendant if he is granted work-release privileges and out of other resources of the defendant, including all real and personal property owned by the defendant, and income derived from such property. If the court determines that restitution or reparation should not be recommended, it shall so indicate on the commitment. If, however, the court determines that restitution or reparation should be recommended, the court shall make its recommendation a part of the order committing the defendant to custody. The recommendation shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of G.S. 15A-1343(d) and Article 81C of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes. If the offense is one in which there is evidence of physical, mental or sexual abuse of a minor, the court may order the defendant to pay from work release earnings the cost of rehabilitative treatment for the minor. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare and distribute forms which provide ample space to make restitution or reparation recommendations incident to commitments, which forms shall be conveniently structured to enable the sentencing court to make its recommendation.

The Secretary of Public Safety shall establish rules and regulations to implement this section, which shall include adequate notice to the prisoner that the payment of restitution or reparation from any earnings gained by the prisoner while on work release is being considered as a condition of any work-release privileges granted the prisoner, and opportunity for the prisoner to be heard. Such rules and regulations shall also provide additional methods whereby facts may be obtained to supplement the recommendation of the sentencing court.

History.

1977, c. 614, s. 7; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 33; 1981, c. 541, ss. 4-9; 1985, c. 474, s. 4; 1987, c. 397, ss. 2, 3; c. 598, s. 5; 1998-212, s. 19.4(g); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-33.2.
Restitution by prisoners with work-release privileges. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 474, s. 4.

As a rehabilitative measure, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized to require any prisoner granted work-release privileges to make restitution or reparation to an aggrieved party from any earnings gained by the defendant while on work release when the sentencing court recommends that restitution or reparation be paid by the defendant out of any earnings gained by the defendant if he is granted work-release privileges and out of other resources of the defendant, including all real and personal property owned by the defendant and the income derived from such property. The Secretary shall not be bound by such recommendation, but if they elect not to implement the recommendation, they shall state in writing the reasons therefor, and shall forward the same to the sentencing court.

When an active sentence is imposed, the court shall consider whether, as a rehabilitative measure, it should recommend to the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction that restitution or reparation be made by the defendant out of any earnings gained by the defendant if he is granted work-release privileges and out of other resources of the defendant, including all real and personal property owned by the defendant, and income derived from such property. If the court determines that restitution or reparation should not be recommended, it shall so indicate on the commitment. If, however, the court determines that restitution or reparation should be recommended, the court shall make its recommendation a part of the order committing the defendant to custody. The recommendation shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of G.S. 15A-1343(d) and Article 81C of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes. If the offense is one in which there is evidence of physical, mental or sexual abuse of a minor, the court may order the defendant to pay from work release earnings the cost of rehabilitative treatment for the minor. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare and distribute forms which provide ample space to make restitution or reparation recommendations incident to commitments, which forms shall be conveniently structured to enable the sentencing court to make its recommendation.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall establish rules and regulations to implement this section, which shall include adequate notice to the prisoner that the payment of restitution or reparation from any earnings gained by the prisoner while on work release is being considered as a condition of any work-release privileges granted the prisoner, and opportunity for the prisoner to be heard. Such rules and regulations shall also provide additional methods whereby facts may be obtained to supplement the recommendation of the sentencing court.

History.

1977, c. 614, s. 7; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 33; 1981, c. 541, ss. 4-9; 1985, c. 474, s. 4; 1987, c. 397, ss. 2, 3; c. 598, s. 5; 1998-212, s. 19.4(g); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§§ 148-34,
148-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1957, c. 349, s. 11.

§ 148-36.
Secretary of Public Safety to control classification and operation of prison facilities. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

All facilities established or acquired by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall be under the administrative control and direction of the Secretary of Public Safety, and operated under rules and regulations proposed by the Secretary and adopted by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety as provided in

G.S. 148-11

. Subject to such rules and regulations, the Secretary shall classify the facilities of the State prison system and develop a variety of programs so as to permit proper segregation and treatment of prisoners according to the nature of the offenses committed, the character and mental condition of the prisoners, and such other factors as should be considered in providing an individualized system of discipline, care, and correctional treatment of persons committed to the Division. The Secretary of Public Safety, or his authorized representative, shall designate the places of confinement where sentences to imprisonment in the State’s prison system shall be served. The Secretary or his representative may designate any available facility appropriate for the individual in view of custodial and correctional considerations.

History.

1931, c. 145, s. 28; c. 277, s. 8; 1933, c. 46, ss. 3, 4; c. 172, ss. 4, 17; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 7; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 7; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(zzzzzzz).

§ 148-36.
Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to control classification and operation of prison facilities. [Effective January 1, 2023]

All facilities established or acquired by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall be under the administrative control and direction of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, and operated under rules and regulations proposed by the Secretary and adopted by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction as provided in

G.S. 148-11

. Subject to such rules and regulations, the Secretary shall classify the facilities of the State prison system and develop a variety of programs so as to permit proper segregation and treatment of prisoners according to the nature of the offenses committed, the character and mental condition of the prisoners, and such other factors as should be considered in providing an individualized system of discipline, care, and correctional treatment of persons committed to the Division. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, or his authorized representative, shall designate the places of confinement where sentences to imprisonment in the State’s prison system shall be served. The Secretary or his representative may designate any available facility appropriate for the individual in view of custodial and correctional considerations.

History.

1931, c. 145, s. 28; c. 277, s. 8; 1933, c. 46, ss. 3, 4; c. 172, ss. 4, 17; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 7; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 7; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(zzzzzzz); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).